Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 2 Powers and Duties Generally

Cross references.

Registration with Secretary of State of trademarks or service marks, §

10-1-440

et seq.

Designation of Secretary of State as commissioner of securities, §

10-5-10

.

Service by Secretary of State as ex officio corporation commissioner, §

14-5-20

.

Authority of Secretary of State to challenge qualifications of candidates for federal and state office, §

21-2-5

.

Powers and duties of Secretary of State relating to elections generally, §

21-2-50

et seq.

Powers and duties of Secretary of State regarding professional fund raisers and solicitors, T. 43, C. 17.

45-13-20.
Duties of Secretary of State generally.

The Secretary of State shall have the following duties:

To keep the great seal of the state, which seal was adopted August 17, 1914, and is now on deposit in the office of the Secretary of State;

To keep the original Acts passed by the General Assembly and all the public records of the state not appertaining especially to other offices; to look to and preserve the records and papers belonging to the Senate and the House of Representatives; and to see that the original journals of both houses are deposited and kept in his office;

To attest all grants and other public documents issuing from the Governor and requiring the great seal of the state;

To keep a record of all grants issued by the state;

To keep safely all bonds of agents appointed to disburse public money;

To furnish to all applicants, upon the payment of the prescribed fees, copies of all records and public documents within his office and to attach the great seal of the state to such transcripts as the Governor or General Assembly may direct;

To destroy, quadrennially, all election returns of those officials whose terms of office have expired, which returns are on file in his office;

To keep a book showing the dates when commissions were issued for all civil and military officers;

To keep safely all the records of plats of land granted and to report the condition of such records to the Governor at least once a year;

To keep in his office correct maps of all the different surveys (made by state authority), and maps of surveys comprising the land lotteries, showing their division into numbers, districts, sections, and the like, with a separate map for every district;

To keep a register of the various grantees and the dates of the grants;

To keep correct maps of all surveys of rivers, harbors, swamps, or land, which surveys were made by the special direction of the General Assembly;

When necessary, to contract for the execution of new maps or the reexecution or repair of old maps, subject to the ratification of the General Assembly;

To certify under his official seal, as the comptroller general is directed to do;

(14.1)

To promulgate a regulation that establishes security protocols for voter registration information maintained and developed by the Secretary of State pursuant to Code Section 21-2-211 and 52 U.S.C. Section 21083. The regulation shall be generally consistent with current industry security standards, and in promulgating the regulation, the Secretary of State shall consider those security standards issued by the National Institute of Standards and Technology, the Center for Internet Security, and the federal Election Assistance Commission. The Secretary of State shall, at least annually, certify that the State of Georgia has substantially complied with the requirements of the regulation promulgated pursuant to this Code section;

To print and distribute current maps describing the boundaries of congressional districts and the legislative districts of members of the Georgia Senate and House of Representatives; and

To perform all other duties which are required of him by law or which necessarily attach to his office.

History.

Laws 1783, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 665; Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 959; Laws 1838, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 1030; Ga. L. 1861, p. 72, § 1; Code 1863, §§ 84, 85, 109; Ga. L. 1865-66, p. 249, § 1; Code 1868, §§ 78, 80, 82; Code 1873, §§ 83, 85, 87; Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 434; Code 1882, §§ 83, 85, 87; Civil Code 1895, §§ 179, 181, 183, 185; Civil Code 1910, §§ 208, 210, 212, 214; Ga. L. 1914, p. 1247; Code 1933, §§ 40-601, 40-604; Code 1933, § 40-601.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1945, p. 402, § 2; Ga. L. 1946, p. 75, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1608, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 45/HB 79; Ga. L. 2019, p. 311, § 2/HB 392.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added paragraph (14.1).

Cross references.

Function of Secretary of State as custodian of state flag, §

50-3-4

.

Description of great seal of state, §

50-3-30

.

45-13-21.
Duty to prepare and deliver commissions, dedimus potestatems, and bonds to Governor for signature; executive secretary to submit Governor’s appointments for preparation of commissions, dedimus potestatems, and bonds.

It shall be the ministerial duty of the Secretary of State to furnish, prepare for, and deliver to the Governor for his signature and the seal of the office of the Governor all commissions, dedimus potestatems, and bonds for all public officers who are required to be commissioned by the Governor.

The executive secretary of the office of the Governor shall submit to the Secretary of State a copy of all appointments to public office when made by the Governor, in order that said commissions, dedimus potestatems, and bonds may be prepared and forwarded to the Governor for his signature and the seal of the office of the Governor.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 18, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

45-13-22.
Distribution of Georgia Laws and journals of House and Senate; pricing.

It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State to distribute the Acts and resolutions of the General Assembly of Georgia. The Secretary of State shall notify the legislative counsel of the distribution requirements of electronic version and hard-bound volumes of Georgia Laws. Hard-bound volumes shall be distributed as provided in this Code section. The Secretary of State shall make distribution of the electronic version and bound volumes of the journals of the House and Senate. The Secretary of State shall notify the Clerk of the House and the Secretary of the Senate of the numbers of journals needed for distribution. Distribution shall be as provided in this Code section.

Volumes distributed to members of the General Assembly, to libraries, to institutions of learning, or to agencies outside the State of Georgia shall become the property of the recipient. All volumes distributed within this state to the state or to any of its subordinate departments, agencies, or political subdivisions, or to public officers or to public employees within the state, other than members of the General Assembly, shall be the property of the appropriate public officer or employee during his term of office or employment and shall be turned over to his or her successor, and the Secretary of State shall take and retain a receipt from each such public officer or employee acknowledging this fact. The Secretary of State shall at all times use the most economical method of shipment consistent with the safety and security of the volumes. The Secretary of State shall make the distributions provided for in this Code section. Additional copies of the hard-bound volumes of the Georgia Laws and of the House and Senate Journals may be sold by the Secretary of State to persons desiring to purchase the same. The prices at which such volumes are to be sold shall be determined by the Secretary of State. In determining such prices the Secretary of State shall take into account the approximate cost to the state of producing such volumes and the usual and customary cost of comparable publications. Receipts from such sales shall be deposited by the Secretary of State into the general fund of the state treasury.

Each of the officers, offices, and other entities listed in this subsection shall be authorized to order up to the indicated numbers of sets of the Georgia Laws from each legislative session. The numbers of sets authorized for each such officer, office, and entity shall be as follows:

Law Department — 33 sets, which number may be increased by written order of the Attorney General;

Each state agency or department — one set;

Library of Congress — one set;

University of Georgia — two sets;

Supreme Court of Georgia — 12 sets, which number may be increased by written order of the Chief Justice;

Court of Appeals of Georgia — 13 sets, which number may be increased by written order of the Chief Judge;

Administrative Office of the Courts — one set;

Each superior court judge — one set;

(8.1)

Each clerk of superior court — one set;

Each district attorney — one set;

Each judge of probate court — two sets, of which one set may be retained for the judge’s own use and one set may be issued to the county attorney;

Each state court — one set;

Each magistrate court — one set;

United States Supreme Court — one set;

United States Court of Appeals for the Eleventh Circuit — one set;

United States District Courts for the State of Georgia — six sets;

Clerk of the House of Representatives — five sets;

Each member of the General Assembly — one set;

House Judiciary Committee — one set;

House Majority Leader — one set;

House Minority Leader — one set;

House Budget and Research Office and Senate Budget and Evaluation Office — one set each;

Legislative counsel — 15 sets, which number may be increased by written order of the legislative counsel;

Legislative fiscal officer — one set;

President of the Senate — one set;

President pro tempore of the Senate — one set;

Secretary of the Senate — three sets;

Speaker of the House — one set; and

Senate Judiciary Committee — one set.

Each of the following officers, offices, and other entities shall be authorized to order up to the indicated numbers of the Georgia Senate and House Journals from each legislative session; provided, however, that such officers, offices, and entities shall pay the Secretary of State the cost of acquisition of such volumes:

Law Department — four sets, which number may be increased by written order of the Attorney General;

Each state agency or department — one set;

State Archives — one set;

Georgia Historical Society — two sets;

Each foreign government and each state participating in an exchange and depository program — one set;

Library of Congress — two sets;

Augusta College — one set;

Georgia Institute of Technology — one set;

Georgia State University — one set;

University of Georgia — seven sets;

Department of Administrative Services — one set;

Department of Human Services — one set;

Supreme Court of Georgia — as requested in writing by the Chief Justice;

Court of Appeals of Georgia — as requested in writing by the Chief Judge;

Each judge of probate court — one set;

Legislative counsel — five sets;

Legislative fiscal officer — nine sets;

Each member of the House of Representatives — one set;

Speaker of the House — one set;

Clerk of the House of Representatives — three sets;

House Judiciary Committee — one set;

House Majority Leader — one set;

House Minority Leader — one set;

Each member of the Senate — one set;

President of the Senate — one set;

President pro tempore of the Senate — one set;

Secretary of the Senate — three sets; and

Senate Judiciary Committee — one set.

In the case of newly created courts or judgeships, and in the case of other state departments, agencies, and entities needing session laws or journals or both, requests for session laws and journals may be filled in whole or in part as the Secretary of State deems appropriate; and the Secretary of State may add names to or delete names from the distribution lists for the session laws and journals as he or she deems appropriate, except that the Secretary of State may not delete those authorized to order sets under subsection (c) of this Code section.

Each officer, office, or other entity authorized to order Georgia Laws or Georgia Senate and House Journals pursuant to subsection (c) or (d) of this Code section shall do so by placing such order in writing to the Secretary of State prior to the end of each session of the General Assembly. A written order from an officer, office, or other entity shall remain in effect for two years. The Secretary of State shall not provide Georgia Laws or House and Senate Journals to any such officer, office, or other entity without a written order. The Secretary of State has no obligation to provide Georgia Laws or House or Senate Journals to any such officer, office, or other entity unless a written order has been placed in accordance with the time frame specified in this subsection.

The Secretary of State shall reserve five copies each of the session laws and of the journals of the House and Senate for three years after their receipt. After three years he or she shall hold in reserve one copy of each of the laws and journals. Copies of the laws and journals in excess of the required reserve and not needed for purposes of distribution or exchange may be sold or otherwise disposed of by the Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State shall act as the exchange officer of this state for the purpose of a regular exchange between this state and other states and foreign governments of the session laws and the journals of the House and Senate. To the extent that the Secretary of State deems such exchanges appropriate, if requested by the Attorney General to make such exchanges, the Secretary of State may distribute one set of the session laws and the journals of the House and Senate to each participating state and foreign government.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 406, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1098, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 88, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 7, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1129, § 7; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45; Ga. L. 1990, p. 782, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2431, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2008, p. VO1, § 1-20/HB 529; Ga. L. 2008, p. 267, §§ 4, 5, 6/SB 482; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 2/SB 388; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 45/SB 340.

The 2014 amendment,

effective April 29, 2014, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “House Budget and Research Office and Senate Budget and Evaluation Office” for “House Budget Office and Senate Budget Office” in paragraph (c)(21).

Cross references.

Duties of Secretary of State relating to summary of general amendments to Constitution of Georgia, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. X, Sec. I, Para. III and §

21-2-4

.

Depositing of engrossed copies of laws and joint resolutions in office of Secretary of State, §

28-1-11

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2010, the paragraph (8.1) designation was added in subsection (c) and “subsection (c) or (d)” was substituted for “subsection (c)” in the first sentence of subsection (f).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 782, § 5, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to Georgia Laws and journals for sessions of the General Assembly taking place after October 1, 1990.

45-13-23.
[Reserved] Duty to provide legislative Acts to Office of Legislative Counsel.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 1990, p. 782, § 3, effective October 1, 1990.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1980, p. 644, § 1.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 782, § 5, provided that the repeal shall apply with respect to Georgia Laws and journals for sessions of the General Assembly taking place after October 1, 1990.

45-13-24.
Duty to provide Acts requiring referendums to local election officials.

Within one calendar week after any local Act or general Act of local application which requires a special election is approved by the Governor or becomes law without such approval, it shall be the duty of the Secretary of State to provide a copy of the Act, with a certificate showing the date it became law, to the election superintendent and the governing authority of each county or municipality in which it has application.

Within 60 calendar days after any local Act or general Act of local application which requires a local referendum is approved by the Governor or becomes law without such approval, it shall be the duty of the Secretary of State to provide a copy of the Act, with a certificate showing the date it became law, to the election superintendent and the governing authority of each county or municipality in which it has application.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 128, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1608, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 782, § 4; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 3/SB 388.

Cross references.

Duties of Secretary of State relating to summary of general amendments to Constitution of Georgia, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. X, Sec. I, Para. III and §

21-2-4

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 782, § 5, not codified by the General Assembly, was applicable with respect to Georgia Laws and journals for sessions of the General Assembly taking place after October 1, 1990.

45-13-25.
Employment of assistants to discharge functions imposed by Chapter 5 of Title 10, the “Georgia Uniform Securities Act of 2008.”

The Secretary of State may employ such assistants as may be necessary to discharge the functions imposed on him relative to Chapter 5 of Title 10, the “Georgia Uniform Securities Act of 2008,” provided that an appropriation therefor shall have been made in accordance with law.

History.

Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 88; Code 1933, § 40-603; Ga. L. 2008, p. 381, § 10/SB 358.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules of the Commissioner of Securities, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Office of Secretary of State, Chapter 590-4-1.

45-13-26.
Designation of employees as agents to accept service of process; powers of designees; fees for acceptance of process.

The Secretary of State is authorized to designate one or more of his employees as an agent for accepting service of summons or other process under any statute providing for service of summons or other process upon the Secretary of State or the Commissioner of Securities. Such designation shall be in writing, and all acts relative to such service by any such designee shall be as valid and binding as though performed in person by the Secretary of State or the Commissioner of Securities, as the case may be. The power and authority of any such designee shall cease immediately upon such designee’s ceasing to be an employee of the Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State shall charge and collect a fee of $10.00 for accepting any service of summons or other process under any statute providing for such service upon the Secretary of State.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 381, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 646, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1474, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

45-13-27.
Official directory of state and county officials and officers.

It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State to publish in print or electronically in each odd-numbered year an official directory of state and county officials and officers. Such directory shall also contain the names of the members of the Georgia delegation to the Congress of the United States. The directory shall contain the name, political party affiliation, independent status, or nonpartisan status of each person elected to a state or county office or to the Congress of the United States from this state. The directory shall contain such additional information as the Secretary of State shall prescribe in order to make the directory a useful and convenient reference work.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-13-27

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 432, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 455, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.

45-13-28.
Prescription of user fees for public information services and materials.

The Secretary of State shall be authorized to prescribe by rule or regulation user fees to be charged and collected for public information services and materials, including, but not limited to, the state directory and the mail reference service; and for electrostatic copies, photostatic copies, microfilm, microfiche, and photographs of information, documents, or records which the Secretary of State is statutorily required to accept, maintain, or compile.
Such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”
The fees shall be in such amounts which are reasonably estimated to cover the cost of the services, materials, or copies provided.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-13-28

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2530, § 1.

45-13-29.
[Repealed] Commission for the Celebration of 250 Years of Representative Government in Georgia; creation; purpose; membership; powers; reimbursement; termination.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-13-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 1043, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2001, p. 1043, § 1, effective January 8, 2002.